Washington statutes.
RCW 35.50.225

Procedure—Form of summons.

In foreclosing local improvement assessments, the summons shall be substantially in the following form:

SUPERIOR COURT OF WASHINGTON

FOR [ . . . . . .] COUNTY

. . . .,



















No . . . . .

Plaintiff,

v.

summons for foreclosure

. . . .,

of local improvement

Defendant.

assessment lien

To the Defendant: A lawsuit has been started against you in the above entitled court by . . . . . ., plaintiff. Plaintiff's claim is stated in the written complaint, a copy of which is served upon you with this summons. The purpose of this suit is to foreclose on your interest in the following described property:

[legal description]

which is located at:

[street address]

In order to defend against this lawsuit, you must respond to the complaint by stating your defense in writing, and by serving a copy upon the person signing this summons within twenty days after the service of this summons, excluding the day of service, or a default judgment may be entered against you without notice. A default judgment is one where plaintiff is entitled to what he or she asks for because you have not responded. If you serve a notice of appearance on the undersigned person, you are entitled to notice before a default judgment may be entered.

IMPORTANT NOTICE

If judgment is taken against you, either by default or after hearing by the court, your property will be sold at public auction.

You may prevent the sale by paying the amount of the judgment at any time prior to the sale.

If your property is sold, you may redeem the property at any time up to two years after the date of the sale, by paying the amount for which the property was sold, plus interest and costs of the sale.

If you wish to seek the advice of an attorney in this matter, you should do so promptly so that your written response, if any, may be served on time.

[signed] . . . .

. . . .

Print or Type Name

( )

Plaintiff

( )

Plaintiff's

Attorney

P.O. Address . . . .

Dated . . . .

Telephone Number . . . .

[ 2009 c 549 s 2090; 1982 c 91 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 91: See note following RCW 35.50.030.